src/scripts/Albanian/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

#define Conj  dhe | e | në | që | nuk;
define Aux  do ;
define Prep me | nën | për | nga | pa | kjo | pas;
# removed  më
#define Pp  unë | ti | ne |  të | ai | qe;
#define Clitic i | e | iu | më | na | ta | ui | u;
define Det  një | çdo | kjo | këto  | se | ato | aq | ai | ajo | atë;
define Qw  pse | si | kush | kujt | kur | çfare | ku;
define Aw  jo | po ;
define Aux ka | kam | ke | zë;


define FunctionWord Conj | Aux | Prep | Pp | Clitic | Det | Qw | Aw | Aux ;

regex 
Conj -> conj || _ ,, 
Aux -> aux || _ ,, 
Prep -> prep || _ ,, 
Pp -> pp || _ ,, 
Det -> det || _ ,, 
Clitic -> clit || _ ,, 
Wp -> wp || _ ,, 
Det -> det || _ ,, 
Qw -> qw || _ ,,
Aw -> aw || _ ,,
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ;
